Hawaii, session 2026, HB1559.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the State is committed to maintaining high levels of education by ensuring that public schools provide a safe, secure, and effective learning environment for students.  However, the increased presence and use of telecommunication devices during the school day have become a significant distraction for students, leading to reduced attention and diminished classroom engagement. The legislature further finds that numerous states have enacted statewide policies that restrict or prohibit student use of cell phones and similar devices during the school day.  Certain states, including Louisiana, have adopted policies limiting student cell phone use during the instructional day, with exceptions for educational or authorized purposes, and that early reports from school officials in those states indicate improvements in student focus, attendance, and academic performance following implementation.  National surveys of public school leaders and teachers indicate that a majority report negative impacts from student cell phone use on mental health, attention spans, and educational outcomes. The purpose of this Act is to establish a uniform, statewide policy restricting student use of telecommunication devices during the instructional day in public schools in order to strengthen learning environments, support student mental and emotional well-being, and improve academic outcomes for students throughout Hawaii. SECTION 2.  Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part II, subpart C, to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302A-     Telecommunication devices; prohibited.  (a) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, except as provided in subsection (b), no student enrolled in a public school shall use a telecommunication device on school grounds during the instructional day. (b)  A telecommunication device may be used on school grounds during the instructional day: (1)  With the direct permission of a teacher or school administrator for instructional or educational purposes; (2)  When the device is required for documented medical purposes, including monitoring or managing a medical condition; (3)  During a schoolwide emergency, when use of a telecommunication device is necessary to protect the health or safety of students or staff; or (4)  When the device is required pursuant to a student's individualized education program or section 504 plan, or as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, title 42 United States Code sections 12101 to 12213. (c)  A student who violates this section more than once within the same school year shall be subject to the following: (1)  Immediate confiscation of the telecommunication device by a teacher or school administrator; and (2)  Additional disciplinary action for subsequent violations. (d) A confiscated telecommunication device shall be stored by a teacher or school administrator in a secure location. Storage procedures and policies shall be determined by each school. (e) A confiscated telecommunication device shall be released only to the student's legal parent or guardian.  A legal parent or guardian shall have no more than three months from the date of confiscation to retrieve the telecommunication device.  During that three-month period, the school shall provide the legal parent or guardian with at least three notifications regarding retrieval of the telecommunication device.  A telecommunication device that is not retrieved within three months from the date of confiscation shall be deemed forfeited to the school and may be disposed of or repurposed. (f) No school, teacher, or school administrator shall be liable for the loss, damage, or destruction of a confiscated telecommunication device; provided that the device is stored in a secure location that is not accessible to students, is reasonably protected from theft or damage, and is handled in accordance with school-adopted storage procedures until the device is retrieved by the student's parent or legal guardian. (g)  The department may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 necessary for the purposes of this section. (h)  For purposes of this section: "Instructional day" means the entire school day, including instructional periods, lunch, recess, and transitions between classes. "Telecommunication device" means any electronic device capable of connecting to the Internet or a cellular network and transmitting or receiving communications, including but not limited to cellular phones, smart phones, smart watches, tablets, and other similar devices." SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.